test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: boð
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: boð
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [boði, boð]
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: boðs
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: boð
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: boð
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: boðum
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: boða
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: boðið
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: boðið
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: boðnum
    boð+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: boðsins
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: boðini
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: boðini
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: boðunum
    boð+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: boðanna
